Illinois, session 104th, HB2769.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Medical Practice Act of 1987 is amended by 5adding Section 9.4 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 60/9.4 new)7    Sec. 9.4. Review of an applicant's applications for 8licensure and controlled substances registration. The 9Department shall review an applicant's application for a 10license to practice medicine under this Act concurrently with 11the applicant's application for a controlled substances 12registration under Section 302 of the Illinois Controlled 13Substances Act. An applicant's license and controlled 14substances registration shall be issued concurrently. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.